Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 5. Marriage Records and Divorce and Annulment Reports.

§ 32.1-267.
Records of marriages; duties of officer issuing marriage license and person officiating at ceremony; blocking of social security number.

For each marriage performed in the Commonwealth, a record showing personal data, including the age of the married parties, the marriage license, and the certifying statement of the facts of marriage, shall be filed with the State Registrar as provided in this section.

The officer issuing a marriage license shall prepare the record based on the information obtained under oath or by affidavit from the parties to be married. The parties shall also include their social security numbers or other control numbers issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to § 46.2-342 and affix their signatures to the application for such license.

Every person who officiates at a marriage ceremony shall certify to the facts of marriage and file the record in duplicate with the officer who issued the marriage license within five days after the ceremony. In the event such officiant dies or becomes incapacitated before completing the certificate of marriage, the official who issued the marriage license shall complete the certificate of marriage upon the order of the court to which is submitted proof that the marriage was performed.

Every officer issuing marriage licenses shall on or before the tenth day of each calendar month forward to the State Registrar a record of each marriage filed with him during the preceding calendar month.

The State Registrar shall furnish forms for the marriage license, marriage certificate, and application for marriage license used in the Commonwealth. Such forms shall be configured so as to cause the social security number or control number required pursuant to the provisions of subsection B to appear only on the application for marriage license retained by the officer issuing the marriage license and the copy of such license forwarded to the State Registrar pursuant to the provisions of subsection D.

Applications for marriage licenses filed on and after July 1, 1997, and marriage registers recording such applications, which have not been configured to prevent disclosure of the social security number or control number required pursuant to the provisions of subsection B shall not be available for general public inspection in the offices of clerks of the circuit courts. The clerk shall make such applications and registers available for inspection only (i) upon the order of the circuit court within which such application was made or register is maintained, (ii) pursuant to a lawful subpoena duces tecum issued to the clerk, (iii) upon the written authorization of either of the applicants, or (iv) upon the request of a law-enforcement officer or duly authorized representative of the Division of Child Support Enforcement in the course of performing his official duties. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to restrict public access to marriage licenses or to prohibit the clerk from making available to the public applications for marriage licenses and marriage registers stored in any electronic medium or other format that permits the blocking of the field containing the social security or control number required pursuant to the provisions of subsection B, so long as access to such number is blocked.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-353.34; 1968, c. 318; 1972, c. 92; 1979, c. 711; 1997, cc. 794, 898; 2001, c. 836; 2002, c. 832; 2003, c. 504; 2004, c. 88; 2005, c. 679; 2020, cc. 209, 210, 211.

Cross references.

As to penalty for failure to certify record of marriage, see §

20-24

.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 836 added the last sentence in subsection E, and added subsection F.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 832, in subsection F, inserted “and marriage registers recording such applications” in the first sentence, inserted “and registers” and “or register is maintained” in the second sentence, and inserted “and marriage registers” in the third sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 504 added the last sentence to subsection A.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 88 deleted the last sentence in subsection A, which formerly read: “Such record shall be prepared without statements indicating racial designation.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 679 substituted “data, including but not limited to age and race of the” for “data for, the” in subsection A; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 209, 210 and 211 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “including the age of the married parties” for “including but not limited to age and race of the married parties”; and in subsection F, deleted “of this section” following “subsection B” in the first and third sentences.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 28 Domestic Actions. § 28.02 Marriage. Friend.

§ 32.1-268.
Reports of divorces and annulments.

For each final decree of divorce or annulment of marriage granted by a court in the Commonwealth, a report shall be certified and filed by the clerk of court with the State Registrar. The information necessary to prepare the report, including the social security number of each party or the control number issued a party by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to § 46.2-342, shall be furnished, with the petition or when filing the decree, to the clerk of the court by the petitioner or his attorney on forms prescribed by the Board and furnished by the State Registrar. Information on the report shall include the age of the parties and the number of minor children involved in the divorce or annulment.

On or before the tenth day of each month the clerk of court shall forward to the State Registrar the report of each final decree of divorce and annulment granted during the preceding calendar month and such related reports as the State Registrar may require.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-353.33; 1964, c. 99; 1972, c. 312; 1977, c. 135; 1979, c. 711; 1997, cc. 794, 898; 2002, c. 353; 2004, c. 88; 2005, c. 679; 2020, cc. 209, 210, 211.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 353 added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 88 deleted the last sentence in subsection A, which formerly read: “Such reports shall be prepared and issued without statements indicating racial designation.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 679 added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 209, 210 and 211 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “the” preceding “court by the petitioner” in the second sentence, and substituted “include the age of the parties” for “include, but not be limited to the age and race of the parties.”

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-182 Report of Divorce or Annulment — Form VS4.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony, § 3.

§ 32.1-268.1.
Compilation and posting of marriage, divorce, and annulment data.

The State Registrar shall compile, publish, and make available to the public aggregate data on the number of marriages, divorces, and annulments from the year 2000 forward that occurred in the Commonwealth. The data shall be organized according to the locality in which the marriage license is issued or in which the divorce or annulment report is certified and shall include the age of the parties. In addition, the data on divorces and annulments shall include information regarding the number of minor children involved. The State Registrar shall post, update, and maintain this information on the Department website. Names, addresses, social security numbers, and any other personal identification information shall not be included.

History.

2005, c. 679; 2020, cc. 209, 210, 211.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 209, 210 and 211 are identical, and substituted “include the age of the parties” for “include but not be limited to information regarding the age and race of the parties” at the end of the second sentence.